Utah statutes.
17-36-14.   Adjustments to tentative budget.

After the public hearing the governing body shall make final adjustments to the tentative budget as it deems appropriate, giving due consideration to matters discussed at the hearing. Nevertheless, there shall be no decrease in the amount appropriated, as provided in Section 17-36-17, for reduction of any deficit which exists, nor shall any budget increase exceed the estimated revenue for such budget.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 1975 General Session

